Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1305.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 820.25, as
last amended by Section 2, Chapter 85, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 820.25), is amended to read as follows:
Section 820.25. A. A student athlete shall not use a
postsecondary institution's marks for the purpose of securing
Req. No. 12563 Page 1

comp ensation for use of his or her name, image, or likeness unless
authorized by the postsecondary institution.
B. A student athlete shall not enter into a name, image, and
likeness agreement involving a commercial product or service that
conflicts with a written policy of the postsecondary institution or
that negatively impacts or reflects adversely on the postsecondary
institution or its athletic programs including, but not limited to,
generating public disrepute, embarrassment, scandal, ridicule or
otherwise negatively impacting the reputation or the moral or
ethical standards of the postsecondary institution.
C. A contract for the use of a student athlete's name, image,
or likeness or a contract for professional representation related to
name, image, or likeness that is formed while the student athlete is
participating in an intercollegiate sport at a postsecondary
institution may not extend beyond the student athlete's
participation in the sport at the institution unless the contract is
between the student athlete and the postsecondary institution or a
third party authorized to act on behalf of the postsecondary
institution.
D. A postsecondary institution may adopt reasonable time,
place, and manner restrictions to prevent a student athlete's name,
image, or likeness activities from interfering with team activities,
the postsecondary institution's operations, or the use of the
institution's facilities. A postsecondary institution may receive
Req. No. 12563 Page 2

comp ensation for the use of its institutional marks or facilities in
conjunction with a student athlete's name, image, and likeness
activities.
E. A collegiate athletic association shall not prohibit a
postsecondary institution from establishing agreements with a third
party to act on its behalf to identify, facilitate, enable, or
support student athlete name, image, and likeness activities.
F. An 1. A postsecondary institution may require a student
athlete to take courses or receive education or training in
contracts, financial literacy, or any other subject the
postsecondary institution deems necessary to prepare a student
athlete to engage shall offer financial literacy workshops
throughout each year for student athletes engaged in name, image,
and likeness activities. Workshops must include information
concerning foundational knowledge of budgeting, taxes, contracts,
credit and debt management, savings, investments, and
entrepreneurship. The workshops shall not include any promotional
referral program information nor solicitation by providers of
financial products or services.
2. A postsecondary institution may offer financial literacy as
a course for credit, which, at minimum, includes information on
budgeting, taxes, contracts, credit and debt management, savings,
financial aid, investments, and entrepreneurship. The course shall
not include any promotional referral program information nor
Req. No. 12563 Page 3

soli citation by providers of financial products or services.
Postsecondary institutions offering financial literacy as a course
for credit may adopt policies which allow the course to be applied
toward degree requirements.
3. Postsecondary institutions shall require student athletes to
either participate in a minimum of five (5) hours of financial
education workshops covering the required information provided in
paragraph 1 of this subsection or successfully complete one
financial literacy course within the first two (2) semesters of the
student athlete engaging in name, image, and likeness activities.
Student athletes who fail to meet the requirements provided for in
this paragraph shall forfeit his or her eligibility to engage in
name, image, and likeness activities.
4. A postsecondary institution may provide support to student
athletes through contract review, tax preparation, and financial
advisor services. Any professional providing services under this
paragraph may not charge a student athlete any fees or commissions
or require any compensation from such student athlete. If the
professional is an employee of the postsecondary institution, such
professional must disclose in writing to the institution and the
student athlete any additional employment which may create a
conflicting contractual relationship with a third party. Any
professional providing services to student athletes under this

Req. No. 12563 Page 4

para graph shall not include promotional referral program information
nor solicitations of financial products or services.
5. Postsecondary institutions may contract with a third party,
as necessary, to conduct the financial literacy workshops as
required by this subsection.
SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-1-12563 AQH 02/11/25













Req. No. 12563 Page 5